Florida, session 2026, HB867.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsections (3) through (8) of section 468.203,
Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (5) through
(10), respectively, and new subsections (3) and (4) are added to
that section, to read:
468.203 Definitions.—As used in this act, the term:
(3) "Dry needling" has the same meaning as in s.
486.021(12).
(4) "Myofascial trigger point" has the same meaning as in
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb867 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 867 2026 Legislature
s. 486.021(13).
Section 2. Section 468.227, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
468.227 Occupational therapist; performance of dry
needling.—
(1) The board shall establish minimum standards of
practice for the performance of dry needling by occupational
therapists, including, but not limited to, all of the following:
(a) Completion of 2 years of licensed practice as an
occupational therapist.
(b) Completion of 50 hours of face-to-face continuing
education from an entity approved by the board on the topic of
dry needling, which must include a determination by the
instructor that the occupational therapist demonstrates the
requisite psychomotor skills needed to safely perform dry
needling. The continuing education must include instruction in
all of the following areas:
1. Theory of dry needling.
2. Selection and safe handling of needles and other
apparatus or equipment used in dry needling, including
instruction on the proper handling of biohazardous waste.
3. Indications and contraindications for dry needling.
4. Psychomotor skills needed to safely perform dry
needling.
5. Postintervention care, including adverse responses,
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb867 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 867 2026 Legislature
adverse event recordkeeping, and any reporting obligations.
(c)1. Completion of at least 25 patient sessions of dry
needling performed under the supervision of an occupational
therapist, physical therapist, or chiropractic physician who
holds an active license to practice in any state or the District
of Columbia, who has actively performed dry needling for at
least 1 year, and who documents that he or she has met the
supervision and competency requirements and needs no additional
supervised sessions to perform dry needling; or
2. Completion of 25 patient sessions of dry needling
performed as an occupational therapist licensed in any state or
in the United States Armed Forces.
(d) A requirement that dry needling may not be performed
without patient consent and must be a part of a patient's
documented plan of care.
(e) A requirement that dry needling may not be delegated
to any person other than an occupational therapist who is
authorized to engage in dry needling under this chapter.
(2) The board shall establish additional supervision and
training requirements before the performance of dry needling of
the head and neck or torso by an occupational therapist if the
board deems it necessary for patient safety.
(3) The Department of Health shall, within existing
resources, submit a report to the President of the Senate and
the Speaker of the House of Representatives on or before
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb867 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 867 2026 Legislature
December 31, 2028, detailing the number of occupational
therapists in the state, the number of occupational therapists
in the state performing dry needling, any increases or decreases
in the number of occupational therapists in the state by
geographic area, and any adverse medical incidents as defined by
the board involving occupational therapists in the state
performing dry needling.
(4) The performance of dry needling in the practice of
occupational therapy does not limit the scope of practice of
other licensed health care practitioners not governed by this
chapter.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb867 -01-er